New York, session 2025-2026, A4837.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. 1. (a) The department of health shall conduct a study in 2 relation to opening three new veterans nursing homes in New York state. 3 (b) Such study shall include, but not be limited to: 4 i. the best locations in New York state to site three new veterans 5 nursing homes; 6 ii. the staffing requirements for such veterans nursing homes based on 7 projected demand for beds in such nursing homes; and 8 iii. the costs associated with opening three new veterans nursing 9 homes. 10 2. On or before one year from the effective date of this act, the 11 department of health shall submit such study to the governor, the tempo- 12 rary president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, all members 13 of the senate committee on veterans, homeland security and military 14 affairs, and the assembly committee on veterans services. 15 3. The department of health may request, and is authorized to receive, 16 any information from any state agency that is relevant and material to 17 the completion of such study. Such information received by the depart- 18 ment of health shall be subject to the same requirements for confiden- 19 tiality and limitations on use, if any, as are applicable to such state 20 agency's use of such information. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 22 deemed repealed one year after such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03595-01-5